Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201021-19,152
Foreign corporation; registered office; registered agent.

Each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state must continuously maintain in this state:

(1) A registered office with the same address as that of its current registered agent. A post office box number may be provided in addition to the street address of the registered agent; and

(2) A registered agent, who may be:

(i) An individual who resides in this state and whose office is identical with the registered office;

(ii) A domestic business or nonprofit corporation whose office is identical with the registered office; or

(iii) A foreign business or nonprofit corporation authorized to transact business in this state whose office is identical with the registered office.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 152;

Laws 2008, LB379, § 11.